Utah statutes.
59-10-522.   Extension of time for paying tax.
(1)  The commission, except as otherwise provided by this chapter, may extend
the time for payment of the amount shown, or required to be shown, on any
return required under authority of this chapter (or any installment thereof),
for a reasonable period not to exceed six months from the date fixed for
payment thereof.  Such extension may exceed six months in the cases of
taxpayers who are outside the states of the union and the District of
Columbia.
(2)  Under rules prescribed by the commission, the time for payment of the
amount determined as a deficiency may be extended for a period not to exceed
18 months from the date fixed for payment of the deficiency, and, in
exceptional cases, for a further period not to exceed 12 months.  An extension
under this subsection may be granted only where it is shown to the
satisfaction of the commission that the payment of a deficiency upon the date
fixed for the payment thereof will result in undue hardship to the taxpayer.
No extension may be granted if the deficiency is due to negligence, to
intentional disregard of rules, or to fraud with intent to evade tax.
(3)  Extensions of time for payment of any portion of a claim for tax under
this chapter, allowed in bankruptcy or receivership proceedings, which is
unpaid, may be had in the same manner and subject to the same provisions and
limitations as provided in Subsection (2) in respect of a deficiency in tax.
